Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.100

Conduct of elections.

All elections in towns shall be held in accordance with the general election laws of the state.

[ 1994 c 223 s 21; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.100. Prior: 1890 p 200 s 148; RRS s 9169.]

NOTES:

Elections: Title 29A RCW.